Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.005

Purpose—Construction.

The legislature declares it to be the public policy of the state and a recognized governmental function to assist in securitizing the revenue stream from the master settlement agreement between the state and tobacco product manufacturers in order to provide a current and reliable source of revenue for the state. The purpose of this chapter is to establish a tobacco settlement authority having the power to purchase certain rights of the state under the master settlement agreement and to issue nonrecourse revenue bonds to pay outstanding obligations of the state in order to make funds available for increased costs of health care, long-term care, and other programs of the state. This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

[ 2002 c 365 s 1.]